src/noun-sme-morph.txt
LEXICON MALLASI-/NUORABU- !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
! +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Sub:jnna K ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +PlGenCmp:jd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:jnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Loc:stti%> PxV ;
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Sub:sti%> PxV ;
 +Sg+Com:jnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom:jddi%> PxV ; !^P^ ! was commented out... LA: denne bare for family
 +Pl+Gen:jddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Acc:jddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Ill:jddás%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:jnni%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Com:jddi%> PxPlComV1 ;

LEXICON MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
! +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Sub:jnna K ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +PlGenCmp:jd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:jnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Loc+Use/-Spell:stti%> PxV ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/-Spell:jnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom+Use/-Spell:jddi%> PxV ; !^P^ ! was commented out...
 +Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:jddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/-Spell:jddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/-Spell:jddás%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/-Spell:jnni%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/-Spell:jddi%> PxPlComV1 ;


LEXICON EAMOSH   !!= * __@CODE@__  Deverbal nouns
 +N+Sg+Nom:X4 K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:X4 R ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7#viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7#viđi K ;
 +N+Ess:X4in K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:X2a K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen+Err/Sub:X2 K ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:X2a K ;
! +N+Sg+Acc:X2 K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:X2at K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:X2ak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +N+Sg+Ill:X2ij K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:X2is K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:X2in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Com:X2ijn K ;
 +N+Sg+Com+Err/Sub:X2ijnna K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:X2ijd K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:X2ijd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:X2ijdda K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:X2ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:X2ijnna K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:X2ijgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh:X2ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sg+Nom:X2 PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:X2 PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:X2 PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:X2asa%> PxV ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:X2istti%> PxV ;
 +N+Sg+Com:X2ijnni%> PxV ;
! +N+Pl+Nom:X2ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:X2ijddás%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:X2ijnni%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Com:X2ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;

LEXICON AMOSH !!= * __@CODE@__
 +N: MALLAS- ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp: R ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7#viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7#viđi K ;
 +N+Ess:in K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:00 PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen+Err/Sub: K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen: PxC ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +N+Sg+Acc: K ;
 +N+Sg+Acc: PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:at K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:ak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +N+Sg+Ill:asa%> PxV ;
! +N+Pl+Nom:ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:is K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +N+Sg+Com+Err/Sub:ijnna K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:ijd K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:ijd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:ijnna K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com/Sh:ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sg+Loc:istti%> PxV ;
 +N+Sg+Com:ijnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom:ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen:ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:ijddás%> PxC ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:ijnni%> PxV ;
 +N+Pl+Com:ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;



LEXICON BOAHTINLONGSHORT   !!= * __@CODE@__  Deverbal nouns
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Nom:%> PxCminusSg3 ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:%>X7@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:%>@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7#viđá K ;
! +N+Sem/Act+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7#viđi K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»#viđá K ;
! +N+Sem/Act+Der/viđi+Adv:»#viđi K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgNomCmp+Err/Sub:X7# VEARA ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgNomCmp+Err/Sub:# VEARA ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Ess+Use/NG:%>in K ;   ! Dialects
 +N+Sem/Act+Ess+Use/NG:%>en K ;   !Dialects
! +N+Sem/Act+Ess:%>e K ; !not for nouns
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%> K ;  ! 
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Gen:%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgGenCmp:%>a R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
!+Sg+Acc:%> K ; ! We suspect the Acc is never short
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Acc:%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:%>ak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
! +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Ill:%>asa%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com+Err/Sub:%>ijnna K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+PlGenCmp:%>ijd R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:%>ijnna K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc:%>istti%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc+Err/Sub:%>isti%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com:%>ijnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijddás%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijnni%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;

LEXICON BOAHTIN   !!= * __@CODE@__  Long compound-forms
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»#viđá K ;
! +N+Sem/Act+Der/viđi+Adv:»#viđi K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgNomCmp+Err/Sub:# VEARA ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Ess+Use/NG:%>in K ;   ! Dialects
 +N+Sem/Act+Ess+Use/NG:%>en K ;   !Dialects
! +N+Sem/Act+Ess:%>e K ; !not for nouns
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgGenCmp:%>a R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%> K ; ! 
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
!+Sg+Acc:%> K ; ! We suspect the Acc is never short
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:%>ak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
! +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com+Err/Sub:%>ijnna K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+PlGenCmp:%>ijd R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:%>ijnna K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Nom:%> PxCminusSg3 ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Gen:%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Acc:%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Ill:%>asa%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc:%>istti%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc+Err/Sub:%>isti%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com:%>ijnni%> PxV ;
! +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>ijddá%> Px1V ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijddás%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijnni%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;

LEXICON BOAHTINSHORT   !!= * __@CODE@__ Short compound-forms
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:%>X7@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgCmp@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:%>@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»X7#viđá K ;
! +N+Sem/Act+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7#viđi K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgNomCmp+Err/Sub:X7# VEARA ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Ess+Use/NG:%>in K ;   ! Dialects
 +N+Sem/Act+Ess+Use/NG:%>en K ;   !Dialects
! +N+Sem/Act+Ess:%>e K ; !not for nouns
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%> K ;  ! 
 +N+Sem/Act+SgGenCmp:%>a R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
!+Sg+Acc:%> K ; ! We suspect the Acc is never short
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom+Err/Sub:%>ak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
! +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com+Err/Sub:%>ijnna K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+PlGenCmp:%>ijd R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:%>ijnna K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Nom:%> PxCminusSg3 ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Gen:%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Acc:%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Ill:%>asa%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc:%>istti%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc+Err/Sub:%>isti%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com:%>ijnni%> PxV ;
! +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>ijddá%> Px1V ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijddás%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijnni%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;

LEXICON BOAHTALADDAN   !!= * __@CODE@__  No compound-forms, but reintroduced
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-Spell:»#viđá K ;
! +N+Sem/Act+Der/viđi+Adv:»#viđi K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgNomCmp+Err/Sub:# VEARA ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Ess+Use/NG:%>in K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Ess+Use/NG:%>en K ;   !Dialects
! +N+Sem/Act+Ess:%>e K ; !not for nouns
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+SgGenCmp:%>a R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Gen+Err/Sub:%> K ;	!
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com+Err/Sub:%>ijnna K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+PlGenCmp:%>ijd R ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+Err/Sub:%>ijnna K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Sub:%>ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Nom:%> PxCminusSg3 ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Gen:%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Acc:%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Ill:%>asa%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc:%>istti%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Loc+Err/Sub:%>isti%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Sg+Com:%>ijnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijddás%> PxC ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijnni%> PxV ;
 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;

LEXICON BOAHTINLONGSHORTTV    !!= * __@CODE@__ +CmpN/Sg +CmpN/DefSgGen +CmpN/DefPlGen +CmpN/SgLeft +CmpN/SgNomLeft +CmpN/SgGenLeft +CmpN/PlGenLeft
 +CmpN/Sg+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft: BOAHTINLONGSHORTTVCT ;
